North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-07 Contractors
43-07-25.
Licensed contractors’ list.

On request, the registrar shall provide city and county enforcement officials with a list of contractors licensed under this chapter. The registrar shall also provide similar information to persons governed by section 43-07-24. Whenever the registrar obtains information on the activities of a contractor doing business in this state of which officials of workforce safety and insurance, job service North Dakota, or tax commissioner may be unaware and that may be relevant to the duties of those officials, the registrar shall provide any relevant information to those officials for the purpose of administering their duties.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 512, § 2; 1989, ch. 509, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

43-07-26.
Warranty repairs — Required notice.

Before undertaking any repair, other than emergency repair, or instituting any action for breach of warranty in the construction of a one-family or two-family dwelling, or an improvement with a value exceeding two thousand dollars to a dwelling, the purchaser or owner shall give the contractor written notice by mail, within six months after knowledge of the defect, advising the contractor of any defect and giving the contractor a reasonable time to comply with this section. Within a reasonable time after receiving the notice, the contractor shall inspect the defect and provide a response to the purchaser or owner, and, if appropriate, remedy the defect within a reasonable time thereafter. The contractor shall provide the purchaser or owner written notice of the requirements of this section at the time of closing for the property or, in the case of an improvement, at the time of completion of the improvement. For the purposes of this section, “reasonable time” means within thirty business days after the notice is mailed or any shorter period of time as may be appropriate under the circumstances.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 358, § 1.